Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-470
Drunk or reckless driving.

Any person subject to this code who operates any vehicle while under the influence of alcoholic liquor or any drug, or in a reckless or wanton manner, shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

Laws 1969, c. 458, § 70, p. 1578.